Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1703
State lands; acquisition for county road purposes; approval of Governor and Department of Transportation; damages.

The county board of any county and the governing authority of any city or village may acquire land owned, occupied, or controlled by the state or any state institution, board, agency, or commission, whenever such land is necessary to construct, reconstruct, improve, relocate, or maintain a county road or a city or village street or to provide adequate drainage for such roads or streets. The procedure for such acquisition shall, as nearly as possible, be that provided in sections 72-224.02 and 72-224.03. Prior to taking any land for any such purposes, a certificate that the taking of such land is in the public interest must be obtained from the Governor and from the Department of Transportation and be filed in the office of the Department of Administrative Services and a copy thereof in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds. The damages assessed in such proceedings shall be paid to the Board of Educational Lands and Funds and shall be remitted by that board to the State Treasurer for credit to the proper account.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 3, p. 542;

Laws 1969, c. 317, § 10, p. 1149;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 141.